California statutes. Civil Code
(d) The provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c) apply only to the following types of personal property:

(1) Any goods, as defined in paragraph (44) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, except for vessels, vehicles, and aircraft, that are used or bought for use primarily for personal, family, or household purposes and that has a fair market value of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per individual item at the time the security interest is created.

(2) The property described in Section 704.050 and subdivision (a) of Section 704.060 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except for vessels,
 vehicles, and aircraft.

(e) Any security interest taken in violation of either subdivision (a) or (b) is void and unenforceable.

(f) Any person injured by a violation of this section may bring a civil action for the recovery of damages, equitable relief, and attorney’s fees and costs.

(g) For the purpose of this section:

(1) “Household goods” means and includes clothing, furniture, appliances, one radio, one television, linens, china, crockery, kitchenware, personal effects, and wedding rings. “Household goods” does not include works of art, electronic entertainment equipment (except one radio and one television), items acquired as antiques, and jewelry (except wedding rings).

(2) “Antique” means any item over one hundred years of age, including such items that have been repaired or renovated without changing their original form or character.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 3.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.101.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) “Adverse information” means information directly or indirectly indicating that a delinquency has occurred, because a cosigner has not complied with the contractual provisions of a consumer credit contract. 

(2) “Collection action” means requesting a cosigner to pay all or part of the obligation on a consumer credit
 contract. 

(3) “Cosigner” means a natural person, other than the primary obligor or the spouse of the primary obligor, who renders himself or herself liable for the obligation on a consumer credit contract without compensation. The term includes a person whose signature is requested by a creditor as a condition to granting credit to another person. A person who does not receive goods, services, or money in return for executing a consumer credit contract does not receive compensation within the meaning of this section. “Cosigner” does not include a joint applicant for open-end credit pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1799.91. A person is a cosigner within the meaning of this section whether or not he or she is designated as such on a consumer credit contract or other document creating the consumer credit contract obligation for the cosigner. 

(4) “Delinquency” means a failure
 to make timely payment to the creditor of all or a portion of any installment under a consumer credit contract. 

(5) “Notice” means a writing which describes, recites, or otherwise refers to a delinquency. 

(6) “Obligation” means an indebtedness incurred by an individual for personal, family, or household purposes. 

(7) “Person” means an individual, firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation.

(8) “Primary obligor” means one or more persons, other than a cosigner, who sign a consumer credit contract and assume an obligation as debtor under that contract.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e), no creditor shall provide any adverse information with
 respect to any cosigner, to a consumer credit reporting agency regarding a delinquency on a consumer credit contract entered into on or after July 1, 1992, unless, at or before the time the information is provided to the consumer credit reporting agency, written notice of the delinquency is provided to the cosigner. 

(c) No creditor shall provide any information regarding the cosigner’s obligation on a consumer credit contract to a debt collector, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1788.2, until notice has been provided to the cosigner under subdivision (b). 

(d) The notice requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) do not apply to any cosigner whose address, as shown in the creditor’s records respecting the consumer credit contract, is the same as the primary obligor. 

(e) The notice requirements of subdivisions
 (b) and (c) shall be satisfied by mailing a copy of the required notice to the cosigner at the cosigner’s address, as shown in the creditor’s records respecting the consumer credit contract. However, if more than one cosigner reside at the same address, as shown in the creditor’s records respecting the consumer credit contract, a notice addressed to any cosigner at that address shall be deemed notice to all the cosigners residing at that address. 

(f) Nothing in this section shall require any particular form or language with respect to a notice of delinquency sent to either a primary obligor or cosigner.

(g) Within a reasonable time after a creditor has reported to a credit reporting agency that a delinquency or delinquencies that have been reported to the consumer credit reporting agency and included in the cosigner’s file maintained by the consumer credit reporting agency have
 been cured, the consumer credit reporting agency shall indicate in the file that the payment was made. 

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require notice of a delinquency to be provided to a cosigner in any instance not expressly specified in this section, or to provide notice to persons other than cosigners. 

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1992.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.102.

(a) A cosigner who suffers a loss as a result of a violation of Section 1799.101 may bring an action to recover actual damages or two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever is greater, and reasonable attorney fees.

(b) The cosigner shall, not less than 30 days prior to bringing an action pursuant to subdivision (a), notify the person alleged to have violated Section 1799. 101 of the cosigner’s intention to bring an action. The notice shall include a statement of the specific evidence that proves the loss suffered by the cosigner. If within 25 days after the date of
 receiving the notice, the person alleged to have violated Section 1799.101 tenders to the cosigner an amount equal to the loss, or otherwise resolves the matter to the cosigner’s satisfaction, the cosigner shall be barred from further recovery of that loss, including reasonable attorney fees.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1549, Sec. 2.   Section operative July 1, 1992, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.103.

No consumer credit contract or guarantee of a consumer credit contract shall provide for a security interest in any investment property, as defined in paragraph (49) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, that is pledged as collateral, unless (a) the contract either specifically identifies the investment property as collateral or (b) the secured party is a securities intermediary, as defined in paragraph (14) of subdivision (a) of Section 8102 of the Commercial Code, or commodity intermediary, as defined in
 paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, with respect to the investment property. The identification of an account shall include the name of the holder, account number, and name of the institute holding the investment property. In the event that a consumer credit contract or guarantee does not comply with this section, the security interest in the investment property is void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.104.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.86. CONSUMER CONTRACT AWARENESS ACT OF 1990 [1799.200. - 1799.209.]

1799.200.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the Consumer Contract Awareness Act of 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1079, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.201.

As used in this title:

(a) “Consumer” means a natural person who has entered into a consumer contract with a seller. 

(b) “Consumer contract” means a writing prepared by a seller and, except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 1799.202, signed, or to be signed, by a consumer, which provides (1) for the sale or lease of goods or services that are purchased or leased primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, or
 (2) for extension of credit, the proceeds of which are used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. Without affecting the enforceability of any incidental provision contained therein, an application for credit shall not be considered to be a consumer contract for purposes of this section even if it contains incidental provisions, such as the consumer’s consent to a credit review, a certification of the accuracy of the information furnished, or the consumer’s agreement to the terms that will be furnished to the consumer pursuant to this title.

(c) “Consumer contract guaranty” means a writing prepared by a seller and signed, or to be signed, by a guarantor which guarantees the obligation of a consumer under a consumer contract.

(d) “Copy” means a reproduction, facsimile, or duplicate. 

(e) “Days” means
 calendar days. 

(f) “Goods” means tangible and intangible personal property. 

(g) “Guarantor” means a person who guarantees the obligation of a consumer under a consumer contract by signing a consumer contract guaranty.

(h) “Seller” means a person who has entered into a consumer contract with a consumer. 

(i) “Services” means work, labor, and services, including depository services and other banking services. 

(j) “Financial institution” means any commercial bank, trust company, savings and loan association, credit union, industrial loan company, insurance company, or person engaged in the business of lending money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 879, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.202.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a seller shall deliver a copy of a consumer contract to the consumer at the time it is signed by the consumer if the consumer contract is signed at a place of business of the seller. If the consumer contract is not signed by the consumer at a place of business of the seller, and the seller has not provided a copy of the consumer contract for the consumer which the consumer is instructed to keep, the seller shall mail or deliver a copy of it to the consumer within 10 calendar days after the
 seller receives the signed consumer contract. In any case, the copy of the contract provided to the consumer shall not contain any blank spaces to be completed after the consumer signs the contract, shall contain the signature of the seller if it provides for that signature, and may also contain the signature of the consumer.

(b) A seller that is a financial institution need not deliver to the consumer, pursuant to subdivision (a), any writing which the consumer contract incorporates by reference if either of the following conditions apply:

(1) The writing was previously delivered or mailed to the consumer.

(2) The writing was not prepared by the seller. 

(c) If the consumer contract (1) is wholly or partly contained on a card or other writing which is
 used to identify the consumer in connection with a deposit account, safe deposit box, safekeeping agreement, or other service offered by a financial institution, and (2) contains information particular to the consumer’s account, box, or other arrangement that, if known by a third party, could be used by the third party to cause loss to the consumer or financial institution, the copy of the contract furnished to the consumer need not contain the consumer’s signature or any of the identifying information particular to the consumer’s account, box, or other arrangement.

For purposes of this subdivision, a document which includes the same terms as those contained in the consumer contract shall be deemed a copy.

(d) Within a reasonable time after receipt of a written request from a consumer, a seller or financial institution shall mail a copy of the consumer’s completed consumer credit application, which
 may, but need not, contain any information completed or added by the seller or financial institution, to the consumer at the address indicated on the request. By making a written request, the consumer shall conclusively be deemed to have waived any action against the seller or financial institution, as well as its employees or agents, on any theory, at law or in equity, arising directly or indirectly out of the mailing or other delivery of the copy, including any information added to the application by the seller or financial institution and included in the copy. The seller or financial institution may specify the address to which such a request may be sent, may charge the consumer a reasonable copying fee, and shall not be obligated to provide the copy until the fee is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.203.

(a) It shall be deemed compliance with Section 1799.202 if a copy of any consumer contract which is subject to Article 10 (commencing with Section 1810.1) of Chapter 1 of Title 2, or which is an open-end consumer credit plan subject to Section 127 of the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. 1637), is delivered or mailed to the consumer before the consumer enters into a transaction covered and permitted by the consumer contract. 

(b) Section 1799.202 does not apply to any of the following: 

(1) A
 consumer contract for the purchase of goods by mail if the seller permits the consumer to examine the goods for seven calendar days and cancel the consumer contract and receive a full refund within 30 calendar days for returned unused and undamaged goods. 

(2) A written contract created by, and consisting of, an exchange of letters by mail. 

(3) Any consumer contract which is required to be mailed or delivered at a time prescribed by another law of this state or the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1129, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.204.

If more than one consumer has signed a consumer contact, the seller may comply with Section 1799.202 by mailing or delivering the copy to any one of the consumers who reside at the same address. A copy shall also be mailed or delivered to any other consumer who has signed the consumer contract and who does not reside at the same address.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1079, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.205.

(a) A seller who fails to comply with Section 1799.202 is liable to the consumer for any actual damages suffered by the consumer as the result of that failure. The remedy provided by this subdivision is nonexclusive and is in addition to any other remedies or penalties available under other laws of this state. 

(b) Failure to comply with Section 1799.202 does not create an independent basis for the rescission, but is admissible to establish a basis for the rescission of the contract otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1129, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.206.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a seller shall deliver a copy of the consumer contract guaranty to the guarantor at the time the consumer contract guaranty is signed by the guarantor if the consumer contract guaranty is signed by the guarantor at a place of business of the seller. If the consumer contract guaranty is not signed by the guarantor at a place of business of the seller, and the seller has not provided a copy of the consumer contract guaranty for the guarantor which the guarantor is able to keep, the seller
 shall mail or deliver a copy of the consumer contract guaranty to the guarantor within 10 calendar days after the seller receives the signed consumer contract guaranty. In any case, the copy of the consumer contract guaranty provided to the guarantor shall not contain any blank spaces to be completed after the guarantor signs the guaranty, shall contain the signature of the seller if it provides for that signature, and may also contain the signature of the guarantor.

(b) If more than one guarantor has signed the consumer contract guaranty, the seller may comply with subdivision (a) by mailing or delivering the copy to any one of the guarantors who reside at the same address. A copy shall also be mailed or delivered to any guarantor who has signed the consumer contract guaranty and who does not reside at the same address.

(c) A seller that fails to comply with this section is
 liable to the guarantor for any actual damages suffered by the guarantor as the result of that failure. The remedy provided by this subdivision is nonexclusive and in addition to any other remedies or penalties available under other laws of this state.

(d) Failure to comply with this section does not create a new basis for rescission, but is admissible to establish a basis for rescission of the consumer contract guaranty otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 879, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.207.

Any waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy, and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 815, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.208.

(a) A seller shall not require a consumer to agree to a provision that would do either of the following:

(1) Require the consumer to arbitrate outside of California a claim arising in California.

(2) Require the consumer to arbitrate a controversy arising in California under the substantive law of a state other than California.

(b) Any provision of a contract that violates subdivision (a) is voidable by the consumer, and if a provision is rendered void at the request of the consumer, the matter shall be adjudicated in California and California law shall govern the dispute.

(c) In addition to injunctive relief and any other remedies available, a court may award a consumer who is enforcing their rights under this section reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in enforcing those rights.

(d) For purposes of this section, adjudication includes litigation and arbitration.

(e) This section applies to a contract entered into, modified, or extended on or after January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 986, Sec. 2.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.209.

(a) If a consumer contract requires a dispute under the contract to be arbitrated and the dispute may be adjudicated pursuant to the Small Claims Act (Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 116.110) of Title 1 of Part 1 of the Code of Civil Procedure), the consumer shall be given the option to have the dispute adjudicated pursuant to that act.

(b) This section applies to a contract entered into, modified, or extended on or after January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 986, Sec. 3.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.90. Commercial Financing Transactions with Small Businesses [1799.300. - 1799.304.]

1799.300.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(b) (1) “Broker” means a person who is engaged in the business of performing any of the following acts in connection with commercial financing made by a provider:

(A) Transmitting confidential data about a prospective recipient to a provider with the expectation of compensation in connection with making a referral.

(B) Making a referral to a provider under an agreement with the provider that a prospective recipient referred by the person to the provider meet certain criteria involving confidential data.

(C) Participating in a negotiation of commercial financing between a provider and prospective recipient.

(D) Counseling, advising, or making recommendations to a prospective recipient about a commercial financing transaction based on the prospective recipient’s confidential data.

(E) (i) Participating in the preparation of any commercial financing documents, including, but not limited to, commercial financing applications, other than providing a prospective recipient blank copies of commercial financing documents.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), transmitting information that is not confidential data to a provider at the request of a prospective recipient shall not, by itself, constitute participation in the preparation of commercial financing documents.

(F) Communicating to a prospective recipient a provider’s approval decisions related to a commercial financing transaction.

(G) Charging a fee to a prospective recipient for any services related to a prospective recipient’s
 application for a commercial financing transaction from a provider.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a person is not a “broker” under this title solely because they take any of the following acts:

(A) Performing support tasks, including, but not limited to, typing, word processing, data entry, filing, billing, answering phone calls, taking and receiving messages, and scheduling, in support of the performance by a broker of any of the activities described in subparagraphs (E) to (G), inclusive, of paragraph (1).

(B) Furnishing a consumer report to a covered entity by a consumer reporting agency in accordance with subsection (a) or (c) of Section 1681b of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(C) Furnishing a consumer credit report, as defined in Section 1785.3, to a covered entity by a consumer credit reporting agency in accordance with subdivision (a) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1785.11.

(D) Furnishing a prequalifying report, as defined in Section 1785.3, to a covered entity by a consumer credit reporting agency in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1785.11.

(E) Distributing or disseminating to a prospective recipient of a provider’s marketing materials or factual information about the provider, its lending activities, or its loan products, including, but not limited to, the provider’s interest rates, the provider’s minimum or maximum loan amounts or loan
 periods, or a general description of the provider’s underwriting criteria.

(c) “Commercial financing” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22800 of the Financial Code.

(d) “Confidential data” means any of the following:

(1) A bank account number.

(2) A bank statement.

(3) A credit or debit card account number.

(4) A credit score, as defined in Section 1785.15.1.

(5) All or a portion of a social security number.

(6) Personal or business income information, including information self-reported by the person.

(7) A taxpayer or employer identification number.

(e) “Covered entity” means either of the following:

(1) A provider.

(2) A broker.

(f) “Depository institution” means any of the following:

(1) A bank, trust company, or industrial loan company doing business under the authority of, or in accordance with, a license, certificate, or charter issued by the United States, this state, or any other state,
 district, territory, or commonwealth of the United States that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(2) A federally chartered savings and loan association, federal savings bank, or federal credit union that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(3) A savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union organized under the laws of this or any other state that is authorized to transact business in this state.

(g) “Provider” means a person who extends a specific offer of commercial
 financing to a recipient, including, but not limited to, a nondepository institution that enters into a written agreement with a depository institution to arrange for the extension of commercial financing by the depository institution to a recipient via an online lending platform administered by the nondepository institution. The fact that a provider extends a specific offer of commercial financing or lending on behalf of a depository institution shall not be construed to mean that the provider engaged in lending or originated that loan or financing.

(h) “Recipient” means a person who is
 presented a specific commercial financing offer by a provider that is equal to or less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(i) “Referral” means the introduction of a prospective recipient to a provider or the delivery of a prospective recipient’s contact information to a provider for the purpose of making an introduction.

(j) “Small business” means an independently owned and operated business that is not dominant in its field of operation, the principal office of which is located in California, the officers of which are domiciled in California, and that, together with affiliates, has 100 or fewer employees and average annual gross receipts of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) or less over the previous three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   (SB 666)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.301.

This title does not apply to any of the following:

(a) A provider that is a depository institution.

(b) A provider that is a lender regulated under the federal Farm Credit Act of 1971 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2001 et seq.).

(c) A commercial financing transaction secured by real property.

(d) A person who makes no more than one commercial financing transaction in California in a 12-month period.

(e) A person who makes five or fewer commercial financing transactions
 in California in a 12-month period that are incidental to the business of that person.

(f) A commercial financing transaction in which the recipient is a dealer, as defined by Section 285 of the Vehicle Code, or an affiliate of the dealer, pursuant to a specific commercial financing offer or commercial open-end credit plan of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), including, but not limited to, a commercial loan made pursuant to that commercial financing transaction.

(g) A commercial financing transaction in which the recipient is a vehicle rental company, or an affiliate of the vehicle rental company, pursuant to a specific commercial financing offer or commercial open-end credit plan of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), including, but not limited to, a commercial loan made
 pursuant to that commercial financing transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   (SB 666)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.302.

A covered entity shall not charge any of the following in connection with a commercial financing transaction with a small business or small business owner:

(a) A fee for accepting or processing a payment required by the terms of the commercial financing contract as an automated clearinghouse transfer debit, except for a fee imposed for a payment by an automated clearinghouse transfer that fails because of insufficient funds in the transferor’s account.

(b) A fee for providing a small business with documentation prepared by the covered entity that contains a statement of the amount due to satisfy the remaining amount owed, including, but not limited to, interest accrued to the date the statement is prepared and a means of
 calculating per diem interest accruing thereafter.

(c) A fee in addition to an origination fee that does not have a clear corresponding service provided for the fee, including, but not limited to, a risk assessment, due diligence, or platform fee.

(d) (1) A fee for monitoring the small business’ collateral.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply if any of the following are true:

(A) The commercial financing transaction is an asset-based loan or factoring, and the fee is intended to compensate the covered entity for actions taken to validate the collateral with the intended purpose of maximizing the amount of financing provided to the small business or small business owner under the financing contract pursuant to which the fee is charged.

(B) The fee is expressed as a dollar amount or a percentage of an identifiable base, and the fee is deemed a finance charge, as described in Section 943 of Subchapter 3 of Chapter 3 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(C) The commercial financing transaction is delinquent for more than 60 days.

(e) A fee for filing or terminating a lien filed in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code against the
 business’ assets that exceeds 150 percent of the cost of the filing or termination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   (SB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.303.

(a) If a covered entity violates Section 1799.302, the recipient shall be entitled to all of the following relief:

(1) Actual damages sustained as a result of the violation, including, but not limited to, the amount of fees paid by the recipient that are prohibited by Section 1799.302.

(2) Statutory damages of at least five hundred dollars ($500) but not greater than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(3) Injunctive relief.

(4) Attorney’s fees and costs.

(5) Any other relief that the court deems proper.

(b) A court may award a covered entity that is the prevailing party in an action brought pursuant to this section reasonable attorney’s fees upon a finding that the recipient brought the action in bad faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   (SB 666)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1799.304.

A waiver of the provisions of this title is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   (SB 666)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 2. CREDIT SALES [1801. - 1812.35.]



  CHAPTER 1. Retail Installment Sales [1801. - 1812.20.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1801. - 1801.7.]

1801.

This chapter may be cited as the “Unruh Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.1.

Any waiver by the buyer of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1603.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.2.

If any provisions of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held unconstitutional, the remainder of the chapter and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.4.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any contract or series of contracts providing for: (a) the construction, sale, or construction and sale of an entire residence, including a mobilehome, or all or part of a structure designed for commerical or industrial occupancy, with or without a parcel of real property or an interest therein, (b) for the sale of a lot or parcel of real property, including any site preparation incidental to such sale, (c) the sale of any aircraft required to be registered under the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, or (d) the sale of any vessel as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 9840 of the Vehicle Code if the
 cash price of such vessel, including accessories and equipment sold in conjunction therewith, exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1149, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, any information required to be disclosed in a retail installment contract or other document under this chapter may be disclosed in any manner, method, or terminology required or permitted under Regulation Z, as in effect at the time such disclosure is made, except that permitted by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 226.18 of Regulation Z, provided that all of the requirements and limitations set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1803.3 are satisfied. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be deemed to prohibit the disclosure in such contract or other document of
 additional information required or permitted under Regulation Z, as in effect at the time such disclosure is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1075, Sec. 1.   Operative October 1, 1982, or sooner, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 1075, as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 129, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.6.

(a) The Legislature finds that the decisional law of this state regarding the characterization of credit transactions as either loans or credit sales has been made unclear by the holding in King v. Central Bank, 18 Cal. 3d 840. It is the purpose of subdivision (b) to clarify such law by establishing standards for determining whether a transaction is subject to the Unruh Act. However, subdivision (b) is not intended to abrogate the judicial principle that the substance of a transaction rather than its form is determinative of its characterization as a loan or credit sale as exemplified by such decisions as Verbeck v. Clymer,
 202 Cal. 557, Milana v. Credit Discount Co., 27 Cal. 2d 335, and Boerner v. Colwell Co., 21 Cal. 3d 37. Subdivision (b) also is not intended to abrogate the decision in Morgan v. Reasor Corp., 69 Cal. 2d 881, to the extent such decision has not been modified by Chapter 554 of the Statutes of 1969 or other legislative amendments to the Unruh Act.

(b) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any transaction in the form of a loan made by a supervised financial organization to a buyer of goods or services where all or a portion of the loan proceeds are used to purchase such goods or services, whether or not the seller of such goods or services arranges the loan or participates in the preparation of the loan documents, unless the supervised financial organization and the seller:

(1) Are related by common ownership and control and the relationship was a material factor in the
 loan transaction; or

(2) Share in the profits and losses of either or both the sale and the loan. 

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) The term “supervised financial organization” means a person organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate to make loans pursuant to the laws of this state or the United States who is subject to supervision by an official or agency of this state or the United States.

(2) Receipt of a loan commission, brokerage or referral fee by a seller from a supervised financial organization shall not constitute a sharing of profits of the supervised financial organization, provided that such payment (i) is reasonable under the circumstances existing at the time the loan is consummated, and (ii) is not
 refundable or is wholly or partly refundable only if the loan is voluntarily paid in full prior to its scheduled maturity. For purposes of this paragraph, a loan commission, brokerage or referral fee not exceeding the greater of 1 percent of the amount financed (as that term is defined by Regulation Z with respect to loans), or twenty dollars ($20), is reasonable under the circumstances existing at the time the loan is consummated.

(3) Payment of money by a seller to a supervised financial organization pursuant to an actual or alleged contractual or statutory obligation to indemnify a supervised financial organization for losses incurred as a result of the assertion by a buyer of claims or defenses with respect to goods or services purchased with loan proceeds shall not constitute participation in or sharing of loan losses by the seller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.7.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any premium finance agreement entered into by an industrial loan company pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 18560) of Division 7 of the Financial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1151.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [1802. - 1802.21.]

1802.

Unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires, the definitions given in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.1.

“Goods” means tangible chattels bought for use primarily for personal, family or household purposes, including certificates or coupons exchangeable for such goods, and including goods which, at the time of the sale or subsequently are to be so affixed to real property as to become a part of such real property whether or not severable therefrom, but does not include any vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, nor any goods sold or leased with such a vehicle if sold under a contract governed by Section 2982 or leased under a contract governed by Section 2985.7. “Goods” also includes a trailer which is sold in conjunction with a
 vessel, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 9840 of the Vehicle Code, unless the sales transaction is exempted under Section 1801.4. As used in this section, “trailer” means a vehicle designed solely for carrying vessels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1186, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.2.

“Services” means work, labor and services, for other than a commercial or business use, including services furnished in connection with the sale or repair of goods as defined in Section 1802.1 or furnished in connection with the repair of motor vehicles (except for service contracts as defined by subdivision (p) of Section 2981 which are sold in conjunction with the sale or lease of a vehicle required to be registered under the Vehicle Code) or in connection with the improvement of real property or the providing of insurance, but does not include the services of physicians or dentists, nor services for which the tariffs, rates, charges, costs or
 expenses, including in each instance the deferred payment price, are required by law to be filed with and approved by the federal government or any official, department, division, commission or agency of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1114, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.3.

“Retail seller” or “seller” means a person engaged in the business of selling goods or furnishing services to retail buyers.
